Klingon/tlh.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [N] [Aug] [Dim] [Pl] [Poss]
                  [1sg] [1pl] [2sg] [2pl] [3sg] [3pl]
                  [Loc]
                  @P.NUM.SENTIENT@ 
                  @R.NUM.SENTIENT@ 
                  @D.NUM.SENTIENT@
                  @P.NUM.BODYPART@ 
                  @R.NUM.BODYPART@ 
                  @P.NUM.SINGULAR@
                  @R.NUM.SINGULAR@
                  @P.NUM.PLURAL@  
                  @D.NUM@
                  @D.NUM.PLURAL@
                  
                  
LEXICON Root
        Noun ;
     
!LEXICON Verb
![to.fire][V]:baH Vinf ;
! 
!LEXICON Vinf
![V->N]:wi' Ninf ;
   
LEXICON Noun
![target]:DoS       InherentlySingular ; ! target
![target]:rayʼ      InherentlyPlural   ; ! target (plural)
![destruction]:QIH  N1 ; ! destruction
[Klingon.person]:tlhIngan     Sentient;  ! Klingon
![nostril]:tlhon               BodyPart;

LEXICON Sentient
@P.NUM.SENTIENT@  N1 ;

LEXICON BodyPart
@P.NUM.BODYPART@  N1 ;

LEXICON InherentlySingular 
@P.NUM.SINGULAR@  N1 ;

LEXICON InherentlyPlural
@P.NUM.PLURAL@[Pl]:@P.NUM.PLURAL@ N1 ;   

! Type 1 noun suffixes: Augmentative/diminutive
LEXICON N1
![Aug]:’a’      N2 ;
![Dim]:Hom      N2 ;
0:0            N2 ;

! Type 2 noun suffixes: Number
LEXICON N2
!@R.NUM.SENTIENT@[Pl]:@R.NUM.SENTIENT@pu’    N3 ;
!@R.NUM.BODYPART@[Pl]:@R.NUM.BODYPART@Du’    N3 ;
!@D.NUM@[Pl]:@D.NUM@mey                      N3 ;
!@R.NUM.SENTIENT@[Pl][scattered.about]:@R.NUM.SENTIENT@mey        N3 ;
!@R.NUM.BODYPART@[Pl][scattered.about]:@R.NUM.BODYPART@mey        N3 ;
!@R.NUM.SINGULAR@[Pl][scattered.about]:@R.NUM.SINGULAR@mey        N3 ;
0:0                                         N3 ;

LEXICON N3
![so.called]:qoq   N4;
![apparent]:Hey    N4;
![undoubtedly]:na’ N4;
0:0               N4;

LEXICON N4
! 1st sg
@D.NUM.SENTIENT@[1sg][Poss]:@D.NUM.SENTIENT@wIj   N5;
@R.NUM.SENTIENT@[1sg][Poss][derogatory]:@R.NUM.SENTIENT@wIj   N5;
@R.NUM.SENTIENT@[1sg][Poss]:@R.NUM.SENTIENT@wI’   N5;
! 1st pl
@D.NUM.SENTIENT@[1pl][Poss]:@D.NUM.SENTIENT@maj   N5;
@R.NUM.SENTIENT@[1pl][Poss]:@R.NUM.SENTIENT@ma’   N5;
! 2nd sg
@D.NUM.SENTIENT@[2sg][Poss]:@D.NUM.SENTIENT@lIj   N5;
@R.NUM.SENTIENT@[2sg][Poss]:@R.NUM.SENTIENT@lI’   N5;
! 2nd pl
@D.NUM.SENTIENT@[2pl][Poss]:@D.NUM.SENTIENT@raj   N5;
@R.NUM.SENTIENT@[2pl][Poss]:@R.NUM.SENTIENT@ra’   N5;
[3sg][Poss]:Daj   N5;
[3pl][Poss]:chaj  N5;
0:0  # ;

LEXICON N5
[Loc]:Daq   # ;
